District of Columbia statutes.
38-1853.14

Authorization of appropriations.

(a)

In general. —

There are authorized to be appropriated $ 60,000,000 for fiscal year 2012 and for each of the 4 succeeding fiscal years, of which—

(1)

one-third shall be made available to carry out the opportunity scholarship program under this division for each fiscal year;

(2)

one-third shall be made available to carry out § 3004(b)(1) for each fiscal year; and

(3)

one-third shall be made available to carry out § 3004(b)(2) for each fiscal year.

(b)

Apportionment. —

If the total amount of funds appropriated under subsection (a) for a fiscal year does not equal $ 60,000,000, the funds shall be apportioned in the manner described in subsection (a) for such fiscal year.

History

Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 211, Pub. L. 112-10, Div. C, § 3014

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1853.04, § 38-1853.09, and § 38-1853.11.